California, session 20252026, SB1260.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21000 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21000. The Legislature finds and declares as follows: all of the following:(a) The maintenance of a quality environment for the people of this state now and in the future is a matter of statewide concern.(b) It is necessary to provide a high-quality environment that at all times is healthful and pleasing to the senses and intellect of man. people.(c) There is a need to understand the relationship between the maintenance of high-quality ecological systems and the general welfare of the people of the state, including their enjoyment of the natural resources of the state.(d) The capacity of the environment is limited, and it is the intent of the Legislature that the government of the state take immediate steps to identify any critical thresholds for the health and safety of the people of the state and take all coordinated actions necessary to prevent such those thresholds being reached.(e) Every citizen has a responsibility to contribute to the preservation and enhancement of the environment.(f) The interrelationship of policies and practices in the management of natural resources and waste disposal requires systematic and concerted efforts by public and private interests to enhance environmental quality and to control environmental pollution.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that all agencies of the state government which that regulate activities of private individuals, corporations, and public agencies which that are found to affect the quality of the environment, environment shall regulate such those activities so that major consideration is given to preventing environmental damage, while providing a decent home and satisfying living environment for every Californian. all Californians.